Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1483.02
Statement; exemption from filing.

By rule and regulation, the commission may provide for other criteria for an exemption from the filing of the quarterly statement by lobbyists and principals, pursuant to section 49-1483, if the commission finds all of the following: (1) That strict adherence to the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act would result in duplicative reporting; (2) that the exemption would not result in information on lobbyists' or principals' receipts or expenditures being withheld from the public; and (3) that the exemption will not frustrate the purposes of the act.

Laws 1991, LB 232, § 8;

Laws 1994, LB 872, § 6;

Laws 1994, LB 1243, § 7.